Utah statutes.
76-6-515.   Using or making slugs.

(1) A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if:

(a)  With a purpose to defraud the supplier of property or a service offered or sold by means of a coin machine, he inserts, deposits, or uses a slug in that machine; or

(b)  He makes, possesses, or disposes of a slug with the purpose of enabling a person to use it fraudulently in a coin machine.

(2)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Coin machine" means any mechanical or electronic device or receptacle designed to receive a coin or bill of a certain denomination, or a token made for the purpose, and, in return for the insertion or deposit thereof, automatically to offer, provide, assist in providing or permit the acquisition of property or a public or private service.

(b)  "Slug" means any object which, by virtue of its size, shape, or other quality, is capable of being inserted, deposited, or otherwise used in a coin machine as an improper substitute for a genuine coin, bill, or token.

